Washington statutes.
RCW 9.68.140

Promoting pornography—Class C felony—Penalties.

A person who, for profit-making purposes and with knowledge, sells, exhibits, displays, or produces any lewd matter as defined in RCW 7.48A.010 is guilty of promoting pornography. Promoting pornography is a class C felony and shall bear the punishment and fines prescribed for that class of felony. In imposing the criminal penalty, the court shall consider the wilfulness of the defendant's conduct and the profits made by the defendant attributable to the felony. All fines assessed under this chapter shall be paid into the general treasury of the state.

[ 1985 c 235 s 3; 1982 c 184 s 8.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 235: See note following RCW 7.48A.040.

Class C felony—Authorized sentence: RCW 9A.20.020.